Nevada, session 83, SB383.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 62A.060 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
62A.060 [1.] “Community service” means [community
service] a community-based activity that:
1. Facilitates civic engagement, facilitates or enhances
connections between the child and his or her community, provides
training in life skills or increases the employability of the child
through basic job training;
2. Is designed to:
(a) Encourage the development of empathy for victims of
crimes;
(b) Repair harm done to victims and the community by giving
back to victims and the community;
(c) Facilitate the development of critical thinking and problem
solving skills;
(d) Facilitate the development of a deeper understanding of
community problems;
(e) Provide the child with a better understanding of how to
make constructive changes;
(f) Assist the child with gaining a sense of individual
effectiveness;
(g) Facilitate the development in the child of a personal stake
in the well-being of the community; or
(h) Provide the child with a better understanding of the need
for involvement in the community in a way that affects positive
change; and
3. Is performed in accordance with NRS 62E.190.
[2. The term includes, but is not limited to, public service,
work on public projects, supervised work for the benefit of the
community or any other work required by the juvenile court.]
Sec. 2. NRS 62E.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.190 1. If the juvenile court orders a child or the parent or
guardian of the child, or both, to perform community service
pursuant to the provisions of this title, the child or parent or
-
*SB383*

– 3 –
guardian of the child, or both, must perform the community service
for and under the supervising authority of [a] :
(a) A county, city, town or other political subdivision or agency
of the State of Nevada [or a] ;
(b) A charitable organization that renders service to the
community or its residents, including, [but not limited to:
(a)] without limitation:
(1) A public organization that works on public projects;
[(b)] (2) A public agency that works on projects to eradicate
graffiti; or
[(c)] (3) A private nonprofit organization that performs other
community service [.] ; or
(c) A program for which the primary purpose is to build job
skills and increase the employability of the child.
2. The person or entity who supervises the community service
shall make such reports to the juvenile court as the juvenile court
may require.
Sec. 3. NRS 62E.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.430 1. [If] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
2, if a child is adjudicated to be in need of supervision because the
child is a habitual truant, the juvenile court shall:
(a) The first time the child is adjudicated to be in need of
supervision because the child is a habitual truant:
(1) Order [:
(I) The] the child to [pay a fine of not more than $100 or,
if the parent or guardian of the child knowingly induced the child to
be a habitual truant, order the parent or guardian to pay the fine; or
(II) The child to] perform not less than 8 hours but not
more than 16 hours of community service; and
(2) If the child is 14 years of age or older, order the
suspension of the driver’s license of the child for at least 30 days but
not more than 6 months. If the child does not possess a driver’s
license, the juvenile court shall prohibit the child from applying for
a driver’s license for 30 days:
(I) Immediately following the date of the order if the child
is eligible to apply for a driver’s license; or
(II) After the date the child becomes eligible to apply for
a driver’s license if the child is not eligible to apply for a driver’s
license.
(b) The second or any subsequent time the child is adjudicated
to be in need of supervision because the child is a habitual truant:
(1) Order:
(I) The child to pay a fine of not more than $200 or, if the
parent or guardian of the child knowingly induced the child to be a
habitual truant, order the parent or guardian to pay the fine;
-
*SB383*

– 4 –
(II) The child to perform not more than 10 hours of
community service; or
(III) Compliance with the requirements set forth in both
sub-subparagraphs (I) and (II); and
(2) If the child is 14 years of age or older, order the
suspension of the driver’s license of the child for at least 60 days but
not more than 1 year. If the child does not possess a driver’s license,
the juvenile court shall prohibit the child from applying for a
driver’s license for 60 days:
(I) Immediately following the date of the order if the child
is eligible to apply for a driver’s license; or
(II) After the date the child becomes eligible to apply for
a driver’s license if the child is not eligible to apply for a driver’s
license.
2. The juvenile court may, in lieu of all or part of a fine
ordered pursuant to this section, order the child to perform not
more than 10 additional hours of community service. The
combined total of community service ordered by the juvenile court
each time a child is adjudicated to be in need of supervision must
not exceed 20 hours.
3. The juvenile court may suspend the payment of a fine
ordered pursuant to [paragraph (a) of subsection 1] this section if
[the] :
(a) The child attends school for 60 consecutive school days, or
its equivalent in a school district operating under an alternative
schedule authorized pursuant to NRS 388.090, after the imposition
of the fine, or has a valid excuse acceptable to the child’s teacher or
the principal for any absence from school within that period [.
3. The juvenile court may suspend the payment of a fine
ordered pursuant to this section if the] ; or
(b) The parent or guardian of a child is ordered to pay a fine by
another court of competent jurisdiction in a case relating to or
arising out of the same circumstances that caused the juvenile court
to adjudicate the child in need of supervision.
4. The community service ordered pursuant to this section must
be performed at the child’s school of attendance, if practicable.
Sec. 4. NRS 62E.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.440 1. If a child is adjudicated to be in need of
supervision because the child has committed an offense related to
tobacco, the juvenile court may:
(a) The first time the child is adjudicated to be in need of
supervision because the child has committed an offense related to
tobacco, order the child to:
(1) Pay a fine of $25; and
-
*SB383*

– 5 –
(2) Attend and complete a tobacco awareness and cessation
program.
(b) The second time the child is adjudicated to be in need of
supervision because the child has committed an offense related to
tobacco, order the child to:
(1) Pay a fine of $50; and
(2) Attend and complete a tobacco awareness and cessation
program.
(c) The third or any subsequent time the child is adjudicated to
be in need of supervision because the child has committed an
offense related to tobacco, order:
(1) The child to pay a fine of $75;
(2) The child to attend and complete a tobacco awareness
and cessation program; and
(3) That the driver’s license of the child be suspended for at
least 30 days but not more than 90 days or, if the child does not
possess a driver’s license, prohibit the child from receiving a
driver’s license for at least 30 days but not more than 90 days:
(I) Immediately following the date of the order, if the
child is eligible to receive a driver’s license.
(II) After the date the child becomes eligible to apply for
a driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a license on
the date of the order.
2. If the juvenile court orders a child to pay a fine pursuant to
this section and the child willfully fails to pay the fine, the juvenile
court may order that the driver’s license of the child be suspended
for at least 30 days but not more than 90 days or, if the child does
not possess a driver’s license, prohibit the child from receiving a
driver’s license for at least 30 days but not more than 90 days:
(a) Immediately following the date of the order, if the child is
eligible to receive a driver’s license.
(b) After the date the child becomes eligible to apply for a
driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a license on the
date of the order.
 If the child is already the subject of a court order suspending or
delaying the issuance of the driver’s license of the child, the juvenile
court [shall] may order the additional suspension or delay, as
appropriate, to apply consecutively with the previous order.
3. If the juvenile court suspends the driver’s license of a child
pursuant to this section, the juvenile court may order the Department
of Motor Vehicles to issue a restricted driver’s license pursuant to
NRS 483.490 permitting the child to drive a motor vehicle:
(a) To and from work or in the course of his or her work, or
both;
(b) To and from school; or
-
*SB383*

– 6 –
(c) To acquire supplies of medicine or food or receive regularly
scheduled medical care for himself, herself or a member of his or
her immediate family.
Sec. 5. NRS 62E.630 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.630 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a
child is adjudicated delinquent for the unlawful act of using,
possessing, selling or distributing a controlled substance, or
purchasing, consuming or possessing an alcoholic beverage in
violation of NRS 202.020, the juvenile court shall:
(a) If the child possesses a driver’s license, issue an order
suspending the driver’s license of the child for at least 90 days but
not more than 2 years; or
(b) If the child does not possess a driver’s license and the child
is or will be eligible to receive a driver’s license within the 2 years
immediately following the date of the order, issue an order
prohibiting the child from receiving a driver’s license for a period
specified by the juvenile court which must be at least 90 days but
not more than 2 years:
(1) Immediately following the date of the order, if the child
is eligible to receive a driver’s license; or
(2) After the date the child will be eligible to receive a
driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a driver’s
license on the date of the order.
2. If the child is already the subject of a court order suspending
or delaying the issuance of the driver’s license of the child, the
juvenile court [shall] may order the additional suspension or delay,
as appropriate, to apply consecutively with the previous order.
3. If the juvenile court finds that a suspension or delay in the
issuance of the driver’s license of a child pursuant to this section
would cause or is causing a severe or undue hardship to the child or
his or her immediate family and that the child is otherwise eligible
to receive a driver’s license, the juvenile court may order the
Department of Motor Vehicles to issue a restricted driver’s license
to the child pursuant to NRS 483.490.
4. If the juvenile court issues an order requiring the
Department of Motor Vehicles to issue a restricted driver’s license
to a child pursuant to subsection 3, not later than 5 days after issuing
the order, the juvenile court shall forward to the Department of
Motor Vehicles a copy of the order.
Sec. 6. NRS 62E.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.650 1. If a child is adjudicated delinquent because the
child handled or possessed a firearm or had a firearm under his or
her control in violation of NRS 202.300, the juvenile court shall:
(a) For the first offense:
-
*SB383*

– 7 –
(1) Order the child to perform 200 hours of community
service; and
(2) Issue an order suspending the driver’s license of the child
for not more than 1 year or, if the child does not possess a driver’s
license, prohibit the child from receiving a driver’s license for not
more than 1 year:
(I) Immediately following the date of the order, if the
child is eligible to receive a driver’s license.
(II) After the date the child becomes eligible to receive a
driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a license on the
date of the order.
(b) For the second offense:
(1) Order the child to perform at least 200 hours but not more
than 600 hours of community service; and
(2) Issue an order suspending the driver’s license of the child
for at least 90 days but not more than 2 years or, if the child does not
possess a driver’s license, prohibit the child from receiving a
driver’s license for at least 90 days but not more than 2 years:
(I) Immediately following the date of the order, if the
child is eligible to receive a driver’s license.
(II) After the date the child becomes eligible to receive a
driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a license on the
date of the order.
2. If the child is already the subject of a court order suspending
or delaying the issuance of the driver’s license of the child, the
juvenile court [shall] may order an additional suspension or delay,
as appropriate, to apply consecutively with the previous order.
Sec. 7. NRS 62E.690 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.690 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a
child is adjudicated delinquent for the unlawful act of placing
graffiti on or otherwise defacing public or private property owned or
possessed by another person in violation of NRS 206.125 or
206.330 or for the unlawful act of carrying a graffiti implement in
certain places without valid authorization in violation of NRS
206.335, the juvenile court shall:
(a) If the child possesses a driver’s license, issue an order
suspending the driver’s license of the child for at least 1 year but not
more than 2 years; or
(b) If the child does not possess a driver’s license and the child
is or will be eligible to receive a driver’s license within the 2 years
immediately following the date of the order, issue an order
prohibiting the child from receiving a driver’s license for a period
specified by the juvenile court which must be at least 1 year but not
more than 2 years:
-
*SB383*

– 8 –
(1) Immediately following the date of the order, if the child
is eligible to receive a driver’s license; or
(2) After the date the child will be eligible to receive a
driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a driver’s
license on the date of the order.
2. If the child is already the subject of a court order suspending
or delaying the issuance of the driver’s license of the child, the
juvenile court [shall] may order the additional suspension or delay,
as appropriate, to apply consecutively with the previous order.
H
-
*SB383*